Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 1. Generally

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations, Counties, etc. §§ 231 to 336; 63C Am. Jur. 2d Public Officers and Employees § 1 et seq.

Constitutional or statutory provision referring to “employees” as including public officers, 5 ALR2d 415.

Oath of allegiance or loyalty, validity of governmental requirement of, 18 ALR2d 268.

Union organization and activities of public employees, 31 ALR2d 1142, 37 ALR3d 1147, 95 ALR3d 1102.

Legislative power to prescribe qualifications for or conditions of eligibility to constitutional office, 34 ALR2d 155.

Immunity from service of process of public officer while attending court in official capacity, 45 ALR2d 1100.

Right of private person not claiming office to maintain quo warranto proceedings to test title to or existence of public office, 51 ALR2d 1306.

Infamous crime or one involving moral turpitude constituting disqualification to hold public office, 52 ALR2d 1314.

Public administrator, status as public officer, 56 ALR2d 1183.

Construction and effect of constitutional or statutory provisions disqualifying one for public office because of previous tenure of office, 59 ALR2d 716.

What constitutes conviction within statutory or constitutional provision making conviction of crime ground of disqualification for removal from, or vacancy in, public office, 71 ALR2d 593, 10 ALR5th 139.

Power to appoint public officer for term commencing at or after expiration of term of appointing officer or body, 75 ALR2d 1277.

Incompatibility, under common law doctrine, of office of state legislator and position or post in local political subdivision, 89 ALR2d 632.

Delegation to private persons or organizations of power to appoint or nominate to public office, 97 ALR2d 361.

Right of public employees to strike or engage in work stoppage, 37 ALR3d 1147.

Constitutionality of enactment or regulation forbidding or restricting employment of aliens in public employment or on public works, 38 ALR3d 1213.

Effect of conviction under federal law or law of another state or county, on right to vote or hold public office, 39 ALR3d 303.

Right of public employees to form or join a labor organization affiliated with a federation of trade unions or which includes private employees, 40 ALR3d 728.

Validity of requirement that candidate or public officer have been residents of governmental unit for specified period, 65 ALR3d 1048.

Validity and construction of statute authorizing or requiring governmental unit to procure liability insurance covering public officers or employees for liability arising out of performance of public duties, 71 ALR3d 6.

Validity and construction of statute authorizing or requiring governmental unit to indemnify public officer or employee for liability arising out of performance of public duties, 71 ALR3d 90.

20 C.J.S. Counties §§ 97 to 142.

§ 18-3-101.
Time of qualifying.

All county officers elected at a general election shall qualify and assume their offices on the first Monday in January next following their election.

History.

Laws 1879, ch. 34, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 1903; R.S. 1899, § 1224; Laws 1907, ch. 80, § 7; 1909, ch. 85, § 2; C.S. 1910, §§ 1136, 1265; C.S. 1920, §§ 1370, 1515; Laws 1931, §§ 30-110, 30-306; C.S. 1945, §§ 27-101, 27-505; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-57, 18-98; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to constitutional provision authorizing election of county officers, see art. 12, § 5, Wyo. Const.

Salaries. —

The salaries of county officers become fixed at the date of their election, though they do not take office until the first Nickerson v. Winslow, 22 Wyo. 259, 138 P. 184,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 22 Wyo. 259, 138 P. 184,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1914).

§ 18-3-102.
County officers required to execute bonds; amount; sureties; penalty.

All county officers, except county attorneys, before assuming the duties of their office and within twenty (20) days after the commencement of the term for which they were elected or appointed, shall take, subscribe and file the oath of office, and execute and file their official bonds to the state of Wyoming to insure the honest and faithful performance of their duties, in the penal amounts specified and according to the following provisions:

County assessor: a bond approved by the board of county commissioners of five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) with at least two (2) sureties who are residents of the county or of a responsible surety company;

Repealed by Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 2.

County clerk: a bond filed with the county treasurer of not less than four thousand dollars ($4,000.00) with at least two (2) sureties;

County commissioners: a bond approved by the clerk of the district court of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00);

County sheriff: a bond approved by the board of county commissioners of four thousand dollars ($4,000.00) with sufficient surety;

County surveyor: a bond of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) with sufficient sureties;

County treasurer: a bond in an amount prescribed by the board of county commissioners and filed in the office of the county clerk with an approved corporate surety company or at least three (3) sufficient sureties. If for any reason the bond has not been approved by the board of county commissioners, the bond may be approved by the county clerk, but final approval must be given by the board of county commissioners at their next regular meeting. If the board of county commissioners has not prescribed the amount of the bond it shall be not less than the total amount of taxes levied for the year;

County coroner: a bond as specified in W.S.

7-4-101

.

The board of county commissioners may require any county officer who receives county revenue to execute a bond in the penal amount of one and one-fourth (1 1/4) times the amount of revenue received.

Deputy county assessors appointed as provided by W.S. 18-3-107(e) shall execute a bond with the county in the penal sum of two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) conditioned that they will faithfully and impartially observe the laws relating to the listing, assessing and valuing of all property.

Whenever the board of county commissioners requires any county officer to execute a new or additional bond, the county clerk shall immediately give personal notice to that officer. If the bond is not executed within twenty (20) days after receipt of the notice, the board of county commissioners shall declare the office vacant and shall appoint a qualified person to hold the office as provided by W.S.

22-18-111

.

Sureties of official bonds as provided in this section shall be residents of the state and have a net worth of twice the amount secured by the bond and each shall sign an affidavit, which will be endorsed on the bond, of his net worth. Any surety who willfully and corruptly makes a false affidavit as to his qualifications is guilty of false swearing.

If a surety ceases to possess the required qualifications, the board of county commissioners shall require the county officer giving the bond to execute a new one.

Any action to recover on the bonds provided in this section shall be in the name of the people.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 11,§§ 1 to 3, 5, 6, 8; ch. 28, art. IV, § 1; art. VII, § 1; art. VIII, §§ 1, 4; art. XI, §§ 2, 6; Laws 1882, ch. 52,§ 1; C.L. 1886, ch. 58,§ 1; R.S. 1887, §§ 1858, 1889, 1893, 1902,1907, 1910 to 1915; Laws 1890-91, ch. 45,§ 1; ch. 57, § 7; 1899, ch. 11, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 1056, 1083, 1103, 1111,1184, 1223, 1228 to 1231, 1243 to 1245; Laws 1901, ch. 35,§ 1; 1907, ch. 80, §§ 4,12; 1909, ch. 85, § 4; C.S. 1910, §§ 1135, 1140 to 1143, 1155to 1157, 1162, 1181, 1212, 1262, 1272, 1290.; Laws 1915, ch. 3, § 1; C.S. 1920, §§ 1369, 1376 to 1379, 1391to 1393, 1408, 1427, 1450, 1459, 1512, 1522, 1542.; Laws 1925, ch. 31,§ 1; ch. 33, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 30-109, 30-119 to 30-122,30-134 to 30-136, 30-303, 30-313, 30-401, 30-601, 30-801, 30-1001; Laws 1937, ch. 85,§§ 3, 5 to 7; 1939, ch. 39, § 1; 1945, ch. 147, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 27-103, 27-107, 27-109 to27-114, 27-502, 27-507, 27-601, 27-801, 27-1001, 27-1201, 27-1301; Laws 1949, ch. 13,§ 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-62 to 18-69, 18-95, 18-100,18-109, 18-144, 18-172, 18-192, 18-199; Laws 1977, ch. 45,§ 2; ch. 124, § 3; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 2; 1998, ch. 5, § 2; ch. 100, § 2; 2003, ch. 17, § 1; 2017 ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (c) substituted “18-3-107(e)” for “39-13-102(a)”.

§ 18-3-103.
Offices and records to be kept within county; exceptions; records open to public inspection; removal for purposes of copying; penalty.

Each county officer except the county attorney, the county coroner and the county sheriff if the county jail is not located in the county seat, shall keep his office at the county seat of the county in an office provided by the county. If the county does not provide an office then the office shall be maintained at a place approved by the board of county commissioners:

The county clerk, county sheriff and county treasurer shall be furnished offices in the courthouse or building used as such;

The county and prosecuting attorney and the county attorney shall be furnished suitable office space at the expense of the county which shall if practicable be located at or near the courthouse;

The office of the county assessor may be with the office of another county officer as determined by the board of county commissioners;

The office of the county coroner may be located at any suitable location determined by the county coroner with the approval of the board of county commissioners.

All county officers shall keep their offices open during the usual business hours of each day excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays and other days as established by the county commissioners through resolution.

All books, papers and electronic records required to be in county offices are open to the examination of any person without fee. The officer in charge of any documents may temporarily remove them for lawful reproduction purposes and during the period of removal shall not be subject to any penalty. Any officer or person not complying with the provisions of this subsection shall forfeit five dollars ($5.00) for each day he fails to comply.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. XI, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1901; Laws 1890-91, ch. 54, § 14; 1895, ch. 76, § 20; R.S. 1899, §§ 1141, 1222, 1246; Laws 1907, ch. 80, § 6; C.S. 1910, §§ 1134, 1158, 1242, 1264; Laws 1915, ch. 141, § 1; C.S. 1920, §§ 1368, 1394, 1458, 1489, 1514; Laws 1925, ch. 61, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 30-108, 30-137, 30-305, 30-410, 30-507; Laws 1937, ch. 46, § 1; 1945, ch. 92, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 27-102, 27-303, 27-504, 27-609, 27-702; Laws 1957, ch. 117, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-58, 18-76, 18-97, 18-112, 18-119; Laws 1973, ch. 86, § 2; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 2000, ch. 38, § 1; 2003, ch. 17, § 1; 2013 ch. 105, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2019 ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to county seats, see §

18-1-201

.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “Saturdays” following “day excluding” and added “legal holidays and other days as established by the county commissioners through resolution” in (b).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (c) inserted “and electronic records” preceding “required.”

Inspecting, copying of records. —

This section gives no right to inspect and make copies of court records, and a deposition and letters transmitted with the deposition were not part of the records after the case has been concluded. King v. King, 25 Wyo. 275, 168 P. 730,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1917).

Provisions for office space permissive only. —

The provision that commissioners may furnish office space for the county and prosecuting attorney is permissive only. Ward v. Board of Comm'rs, 36 Wyo. 460, 36 Wyo. 461, 256 P. 1039,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1927).

Election contest. —

In an election contest a defeated candidate has a right upon showing of a special interest, to inspect affidavits on file in connection with the case. State ex rel. Romsa v. Grace, 43 Wyo. 454, 5 P.2d 301,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1931).

Inspection. —

Petition filed in an election contest did not show such special interest so as to entitle defeated candidate to inspect affidavits on file. State ex rel. Romsa v. Grace, 43 Wyo. 454, 5 P.2d 301,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1931).

Stated

in

W.A.R.M. v. Bonds, 866 P.2d 1291,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1994).

§ 18-3-104.
Copies of instruments and transcripts of records as evidence.

Copies of all documents, writs, proceedings, instruments, papers and writings filed or deposited in the office of any district judge, county clerk or county treasurer and transcripts from books of record or proceedings kept by any such officers, with the seal of his office affixed, is prima facie evidence in all cases.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. XI, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 1904; R.S. 1899, § 1235; C.S. 1910, § 1147; C.S. 1920, § 1383; R.S. 1931, § 30-126; C.S. 1945, § 27-104; W.S. 1957, § 18-59; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Law reviews. —

See case note, “Constitutional Law — An Indigent's Right to a Free Trial Transcript. Mayer v. City of Chicago, 404 U.S. 189, 30 L. Ed. 2d 372, 92 S. Ct. 410, 1971 U.S. LEXIS 298 (1971),” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 707 (1972).

§ 18-3-105.
Powers and compensation in special cases.

Whenever any county officer is required to perform the official duties of any other officer of this state he shall have for that time the same powers given by law to the officer whose duties he performs and shall receive the same compensation for his services.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. XI, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 1904; R.S. 1899, § 1235; C.S. 1910, § 1147; C.S. 1920, § 1383; R.S. 1931, § 30-126; C.S. 1945, § 27-104; W.S. 1957, § 18-60; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-3-106.
Full-time officers enumerated.

Each county clerk, county treasurer, clerk of the district court, county assessor and county sheriff shall devote full time to the duties of their respective offices during the term for which they were elected or appointed. In counties which are not served by a district attorney and in which the population exceeds nine thousand (9,000) but is less than sixty thousand (60,000), the county and prosecuting attorney shall devote full-time to the duties of his office whenever a majority of the county commissioners in that county resolve that a full-time county and prosecuting attorney is necessary. In counties which are not served by a district attorney and in which the population does not exceed nine thousand (9,000), as well as in counties which are served by a district attorney, the county commissioners may designate the office of county attorney and the office of county and prosecuting attorney as a full-time office. The designations shall be made by resolution at the time salaries are set under W.S. 18-3-107(a).

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 80, § 7; 1909, ch. 85, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 1265; C.S. 1920, § 1515; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 18; R.S. 1931, § 30-306; Laws 1945, ch. 95, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 27-117, 27-505; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-70, 18-98; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 21, § 2.

§ 18-3-107.
Annual salaries of certain officers; additional compensation prohibited; exception as to traveling and other expenses; compensation of county commissioner; appointment and salaries of deputies, clerks, stenographers and other assistants.

County officers shall be paid as follows:

The county assessor, part-time county and prosecuting attorneys, part-time county attorneys, county clerk, clerk of district court, county sheriff and county treasurer in their respective counties shall receive as annual salaries:

Repealed Laws 2009, ch. 142, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2022, ch. 110, § 2.

From and after January 3, 2011, not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) nor more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00);

From and after January 2, 2023 not more than the salary authorized for a circuit court judge in W.S.

5-1-110

.

Full-time county attorneys and full-time county and prosecuting attorneys shall receive as annual salaries:

Repealed Laws 2009, ch. 142, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2022, ch. 109, § 2.

From and after January 1, 2009 through January 1, 2023, and to the extent permitted under the constitution and statutory law, not less than thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000.00) nor more than the salary authorized for a district attorney under W.S. 9-1-802(d);

From and after January 2, 2023 and to the extent permitted under the constitution and statutory law, not less than thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000.00) nor more than the salary authorized for a circuit court judge under W.S.

5-1-110

.

Salaries shall be paid in equal monthly installments. The board of county commissioners of each county shall meet not later than June 1, 1978, and on or before the same date each four (4) years thereafter, for the purpose of setting salaries, which shall not be changed during the term of each official for whom a salary is determined.

The salaries provided in subsection (a) of this section shall compensate county officers for all of the duties prescribed by law to be performed by them, and no such officer shall receive from federal, state or county funds any additional or separate salary or compensation other than as above specified. This restriction shall not apply to traveling and other expenses nor to compensation allowed for office or house rent when expressly provided by law nor to other benefits provided to all employees of the respective county.

Each county commissioner will be paid such compensation as the board of county commissioners determines by resolution. No county commissioner may receive more than the lowest compensation paid any elected county officer in the same county who serves full-time as specified in W.S.

18-3-106

.

The board of county commissioners shall meet not later than June 1, 1978, and on or before the same date each four (4) years thereafter for the purpose of setting their salaries for the following four (4) years, commencing January 1. The salary amount, when determined, cannot be increased during the period for which established. In addition thereof, each commissioner shall be paid his actual expenses while away from his home on official county business and not exceeding the same mileage allowance as received by state employees for each mile actually and necessarily traveled other than in a county owned vehicle in going to and returning from the meetings of the board and in the discharge of the duties of his office. Only one (1) mileage allowance shall be allowed per vehicle per trip. No commissioner’s salary or expense for any purpose shall be charged to any account other than the county commissioner’s account in the county budget. No commissioner shall be allowed any other salary from the county other than that herein stipulated.

By and with the consent of the board of county commissioners of the respective counties, the county assessor, county clerk, clerk of the district court, county and prosecuting attorney and county treasurer in each county in the state may appoint one (1) or more deputies for each of the above-named offices who shall receive an annual salary of not less than twenty percent (20%) of the above named officer’s salary to be established by the board of county commissioners and also appoint such other clerks, stenographers and assistants as may be necessary to properly administer the affairs of any county office.

Subject to legislative appropriation, the state will pay a portion of each county and prosecuting attorney and assistant county and prosecuting attorney’s salary as provided in this subsection. The state will pay fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) or fifty percent (50%) of the salary of the county and prosecuting attorney, whichever is less, per year to each qualifying county. The state will pay thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00) or fifty percent (50%) of the salary of each assistant to the county and prosecuting attorney, whichever is less, per year. Payments under this section shall be made annually on or before June 30. In any fiscal year in which the legislative appropriation is insufficient to make all payments authorized by this subsection, the state treasurer shall provide a reduced payment by multiplying the payment authorized under this subsection by a fraction, the numerator of which is equal to the remaining legislative appropriation for the program for the biennial budget period and the denominator of which is equal to the total payments to be made under this subsection for the current fiscal year.

The board of county commissioners of the respective counties may appoint one (1) or more assistants or staff positions, whose salary shall be established by the board of county commissioners, as may be necessary to properly administer the affairs of the board of county commissioners. Persons appointed to an assistant or staff position shall not perform any duties statutorily delegated to any other county elected official.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 166, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 27-302; Laws 1949, ch. 108, § 1; 1953, ch. 71, § 1; 1957, ch. 191, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 18-74; Laws 1961, ch. 33, § 1; 1965, ch. 101, § 1; 1967, ch. 74, § 1; 1969, ch. 124, § 2; ch. 175, §§ 1, 2; 1973, ch. 60, § 1; ch. 85, § 1; 1977, ch. 15, § 1; ch. 124, § 1; 1978, Sp. Sess., ch. 4, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 13, § 1; Sp. Sess., ch. 21, § 2; 1993, ch. 152, § 1; 1998, ch. 95, § 1; 1999, ch. 131, § 1; 2004, ch. 50, § 1; 2005, ch. 162, § 1; 2006, ch. 29, § 1; 2007, ch. 30, § 1; ch. 31, § 1; ch. 215, § 1; 2009, ch. 142, §§ 1, 2; 2013 ch. 176, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2022 ch. 109, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2022; 2022 ch. 110, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision that legislature shall fix salaries not determined by constitution, see art. 14, § 1, Wyo. Const.

For provision requiring salaries paid to be fixed and definite, with certain exceptions, see art. 14, § 1, Wyo. Const.

As to travel allowances to county attorney, see §§

18-3-304

and

18-3-110

.

As to quarters or rental allowance allowed sheriff in connection with keeping prisoners in jail, see §

18-3-603

.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (c) deleted “other” following “compensation paid any,” and added “who serves full-time as specified in W.S.

18-3-106

.”

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (a), adding the paragraph and subparagraph designations, and increasing salary ranges of the specified county officers.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, added (g).

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment, by ch. 30, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, rewrote (f), changing dollar amounts.

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, added (a)(ii)(C).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, repealed (a)(i)(A), which read: “From and after January 1, 1999, not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) nor more than sixty thousand dollars ($60,000.00)”; added (a)(i)(C); and repealed (a)(ii)(A), which read: “From and after January 1, 1999, not less than thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000.00) nor more than seventy thousand dollars ($70,000.00).”

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, repealed (a)(i)(A), which read: “From and after January 1, 1999, not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) nor more than sixty thousand dollars ($60,000.00)”; added (a)(i)(C); and repealed (a)(ii)(A), which read: “From and after January 1, 1999, not less than thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000.00) nor more than seventy thousand dollars ($70,000.00).”

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013,
in (f) inserted “Subject to legislative appropriation, the state will pay a portion of each county and prosecuting attorney and assistant
county and prosecuting attorney’s salary as provided in this subsection” and added the last sentence.

The 2022 amendments. —

The first 2022 amendment, by ch. 109, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2022, added “through January 1, 2023,” (a)(ii)(C); added (a)(ii)(D); in the second sentence (f), added “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) or” and “, whichever is less,”; repealed former (a)(ii)(B), which read, “From and after January 1, 2007, not less than thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000.00) nor more than eighty-five thousand dollars ($85,000.00)”; and made related changes.

The second 2022 amendment, by ch. 110, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2022, added (a)(i)(D); and repealed former (a)(i)(B), which read, “From and after January 1, 2007, not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) nor more than seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000.00).”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2007, ch. 30, § 2 provides as follows: “There is appropriated from the general fund one million nine hundred thirty-six thousand dollars ($1,936,000.00) to the attorney general's office for the purposes of this act for the fiscal period from July 1, 2007 to June 30, 2008.”

Prevailing clauses. —

Laws 2013, ch. 176, § 2, directs: “This act shall be given precedence and shall prevail over any other act enacted into law during the same session in which this act is enacted to the extent that any other act is in conflict with amendments made by this act.”

Repealing clauses. —

Section 2, ch. 166, Laws 1945, reads: “Sections 30-311 (Laws 1907, ch. 80, § 8, as amended), 30-403, 30-503, 30-802, 30-905, 30-1102 (Laws 1895, ch. 76, §§ 2 to 6, 14, as amended), Wyoming Revised Statutes, 1931, and § 31-227, Wyoming Revised Statutes, 1931, as amended and reenacted by chapter 80, Session Laws of Wyoming, 1941, chapter 52, Session Laws of Wyoming, 1943 (Laws 1895, ch. 76, § 7, as amended) and all other acts or parts of acts in conflict with this act are hereby repealed.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Constitutionality of use of assessed valuation of county for year next subsequent to election. —

Where a district court has determined that by reason of the design, neglect or default of county commissioners or other such officers, an assessed valuation has been set which does not fairly represent the valuation of such county for such year and upon which certain county officers' salaries have been based, use of the assessed valuation of the said county in the year next subsequent to their election and qualification in the computation and determination of salaries of such county officers, which would result in payment to said county officers of a salary different from that based upon a standard which does not fairly represent the valuation of such county for such year would violate art. 14, § 1, Wyo. Const., providing that officers be paid fixed and definite salaries, and art. 3, § 32, Wyo. Const., prohibiting increase or decrease of such salaries after election. Barber v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 222, 277 P.2d 977,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1954).

Amendment. —

The 1911 amendment to former § 18-73, which provided that its provisions should not take effect until after December 31, 1912, making changes in classification of counties, thus affecting the compensation due officials, did not become effective until the day fixed and amendment was a nullity until that time. Nickerson v. Winslow, 22 Wyo. 259, 138 P. 184,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 22 Wyo. 259, 138 P. 184,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1914).

Application under 1945 amendment. —

Plaintiff, who was appointed to fill a vacancy in the office of county treasurer on August 1, 1945, did not come within the exception in the 1945 amendment to this section which provided that act did not apply “to any county officers now holding office.” Ballangee v. Board of County Comm'rs, 66 Wyo. 390, 212 P.2d 71,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1949).

Effect of 1949 amendment. —

The amendment of 1949 to this section could not have effect of raising sheriff's salary during his term of office where it provided standard by which increased salary would be possible, in view of provision of art. 3, § 32, Wyo. Const., that no law should increase salary of public officer after his election or appointment and art. 14, § 1, Wyo. Const., that various public officers should be paid fixed and definite salaries. These provisions may not be circumvented by indirect changes. Blackburn v. Board of County Comm'rs, 67 Wyo. 494, 226 P.2d 784,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1951).

Salary of county clerk. —

No change can be made in the salary of a county clerk during his term, notwithstanding a change in the assessed valuation of the county, which would place it in a higher or lower class. Guthrie v. Board of Comm'rs, 7 Wyo. 95, 50 P. 229,

1897 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1897).

Salary of treasurers

of the counties of the several classes must continue the same throughout an official year, and cannot be made more or less for the last than the first part, though an assessment made within the year shows that it was an “assessed valuation” of a higher or lower class. Board of Comm'rs v. Burns, 3 Wyo. 691, 29 P. 894,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 3 Wyo. 691, 29 P. 894,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1892).

Expense of office. —

Statutory compensation for use of automobile by sheriff was not “emolument” which could not be increased or diminished after sheriff's appointment or election under constitutional provision prohibiting change in officer's salary or emolument after his election or appointment. Taxpayers' League of Carbon County v. McPherson, 49 Wyo. 251, 54 P.2d 897,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1936).

Evidence of approval of deputy. —

Treasurer's written appointment of deputy, filed with county clerk with letter requesting county board to approve appointment with board chairman's endorsement thereon showing approval were in absence of journal record thereof admissible in evidence to show what action had been taken by board. Board of Comm'rs v. Stone, 7 Wyo. 280, 51 P. 605,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1898).

Ratification of appointment of deputy. —

Auditing and allowing salary of deputy county officer, whose appointment must be consented to by county board is sufficient approval of the official appointed and a ratification of his appointment. Griggs v. Board of Comm'rs, 5 Wyo. 274, 40 P. 304,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1895).

Acts within scope of duties. —

Approving budgets and determining compensation for the county coroner's office are statutory functions expressly within the scope of duties required of a member of a board of county commissioners. Therefore allegations of insufficient budget allocations and determination of inadequate compensation levels could not form the basis of a claim for tortious conduct against members of a board of county commissioners. Veile v. Board of County Comm'rs, 860 P.2d 1174,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1993).

Stated

in

W.A.R.M. v. Bonds, 866 P.2d 1291,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1994).

Cited

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. State ex rel. Yeadon, 971 P.2d 129,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1998).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Local Government Law — Platte County's Cost of Living Adjustment: Is It an Unconstitutional In-Term Adjustment of an Elected Officer's Salary?,” see XXXV Land & Water L. Rev. 549 (2000).

§ 18-3-108.
Salaries paid in monthly installments; allowance by commissioners.

The salaries of county officers shall be paid in equal monthly installments by the county in which they serve and shall be allowed at the first regular monthly meeting of the board of county commissioners occurring after the rendition of service.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 76, § 20; R.S. 1899, § 1246; C.S. 1910, § 1158; C.S. 1920, § 1394; R.S. 1931, § 30-137; Laws 1945, ch. 92, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 27-303; W.S. 1957, § 18-75; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions that legislature shall designate and fix salaries of county officers, see art. 14, § 3, Wyo. Const.

Editor's notes. —

Chapter 76, Laws 1895, as amended, was the general basic law concerning fees and salaries of county officers, and it originally consisted of 23 sections. Sections 2 to 7 and 14 have been repealed. For the remaining sections of the act appearing in this compilation see the Table of Disposition of Acts.

This section is mandatory.

Ballangee v. Board of County Comm'rs, 66 Wyo. 390, 212 P.2d 71,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1949).

Determination by commissioners. —

Determination by board of county commissioners that office of justice of peace in certain precinct is salaried office will not be disturbed in absence of proof that board erred in its determination of fact. Davis v. Board of Comm'rs, 4 Wyo. 477, 35 P. 467,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1894).

Cited

in

Ballantyne v. Bower, 17 Wyo. 356, 99 P. 869,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(1909).

§ 18-3-109.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 69, § 208.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1895, ch. 76, § 23; R.S. 1899, § 1238; C.S. 1910, § 1150; C.S. 1920, § 1386; R.S. 1931, § 30-129; C.S. 1945, § 27-306; Laws 1953, ch. 121, § 1; 1957, ch. 144, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 18-78; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1, related to definition of assessed valuation.

Laws 2010, ch. 69, § 501, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 18-3-110.
Reimbursement for traveling expenses; receipt required.

Any county officer whose official duties require him to travel away from the county seat shall be reimbursed by the county for his actual and necessary traveling expenses and mileage as provided by W.S.

9-3-103

. The county sheriff may also be reimbursed for travel away from the county jail for official duties, if the jail is not located in the county seat. No officer requesting mileage expenses shall claim additional transportation expense. The board of county commissioners shall not allow payment for traveling expenses unless there are receipts for all monies expended.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 92, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 1227; C.S. 1910, § 1139; Laws 1913, ch. 13, § 1; C.S. 1920, §§ 1373, 1375; R.S. 1931, §§ 30-113, 30-115; C.S. 1945, §§ 27-307, 27-308; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-79, 18-80; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2000, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to per diem and traveling expenses of state officers and employees, see §

9-3-102

.

As to travel allowances for county attorney, see §

18-3-304

.

Deputy sheriff not entitled to reimbursement. —

Because a deputy sheriff was not a “county officer” as provided by §

18-3-102

, he was not entitled to reimbursement of any expenses under this section. Smith v. Board of County Comm'rs of County of Sublette, 891 P.2d 88,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 18-3-111.
Responsibility of officers.

All county officers are responsible for the acts of their deputies and assistants, and as such are liable on their official bonds.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 74, § 11; R.S. 1899, § 1240; C.S. 1910, § 1152; C.S. 1920, § 1388; R.S. 1931, § 30-131; C.S. 1945, § 27-402; W.S. 1957, § 18-86; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to bonds of officers generally, see §

18-3-102

.

Applied

in

Pfister v. Niobrara County, 557 P.2d 735,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1976).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of public officer for the defaults and misfeasances of clerks, assistants or deputies, 71 ALR2d 1140.

Liability of county clerk or prothonotary, or surety on bond, for negligent or wrongful acts of deputies or assistants, 71 ALR2d 1140.

Personal liability of public officer for killing or injuring animal while carrying out statutory duties with respect to it, 2 ALR3d 822.

Liability of governmental entity or public officer for personal injury or damages arising out of vehicular accident due to negligent or defective design of highway, 45 ALR3d 875, 58 ALR4th 559.

§ 18-3-112.
Powers; bonds.

All deputy county officers have the same power and authority as their principal, and all official acts performed by them have the same force and effect as if done by their principal. All officers appointing deputies and assistants may require from them bond for their own protection, in such sum as they see fit.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 74, § 12; R.S. 1899, § 1241; C.S. 1910, § 1153; C.S. 1920, § 1389; R.S. 1931, § 30-132; C.S. 1945, § 27-403; W.S. 1957, § 18-87; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Applied

in

Pfister v. Niobrara County, 557 P.2d 735,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1976).